Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2444
Construction and other contracts; responsible bidder; considerations; letting of contract.

The board of directors of the agency may let the contract for such work or materials to the responsible bidder who submits the lowest and best bid or, in the sole discretion of the board, all bids tendered may be rejected, and readvertisement for bids made, in the manner, form, and time as provided in section 18-2443. In determining whether a bidder is responsible, the board may consider the bidder's financial responsibility, skill, experience, record of integrity, ability to furnish repairs and maintenance services, ability to meet delivery or performance deadlines, and whether the bid is in conformance with specifications. Consideration may also be given by the board of directors to the relative quality of supplies and services to be provided, the adaptability of machinery, apparatus, supplies, or services to be purchased to the particular uses required, to the preservation of uniformity, and the coordination of machinery and equipment with other machinery and equipment already installed. No such contract shall be valid nor shall any money of the agency be expended thereunder unless advertisement and letting shall have been had as provided in sections 18-2442 to 18-2444.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 44.